Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,119.05
Income tax form; contribution to Nebraska State Fair.

On the individual income tax return forms for tax years 2003, 2004, and 2005, the Tax Commissioner shall include space in which the individual taxpayer may, if a refund is due, designate one dollar or a greater amount of the refund as a contribution to the Nebraska State Fair. In the case of a joint return, each spouse may designate one dollar or a greater amount of the refund as a contribution to the fund.

Laws 2003, LB 72, § 2.